Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.290

Teacher and administrator preparation program approval standards—Community college and nonhigher education provider programs—Alternative route program inclusion.

(1) By September 30, 2010, the professional educator standards board shall review and revise teacher and administrator preparation program approval standards and proposal review procedures at the residency certificate level to ensure they are rigorous and appropriate standards for an expanded range of potential providers, including community college and nonhigher education providers. All approved providers must adhere to the same standards and comply with the same requirements.

(2) Beginning September 30, 2010, the professional educator standards board must accept proposals for community college and nonhigher education providers of educator preparation programs. Proposals must be processed and considered by the board as expeditiously as possible.

(3) By September 1, 2011, all professional educator standards board-approved residency teacher preparation programs at institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 not currently a partner in an alternative route program approved by the professional educator standards board must submit to the board a proposal to offer one or more of the alternative route programs that meet the requirements of RCW 28A.660.020 and * 28A.660.040.

[ 2010 c 235 s 502.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.660.040 was repealed by 2017 c 14 s 3.

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.